Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB520.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 65A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For fiscal periods beginning on or after July 1, 2014, requirements relating to audits
and financial statements of special purpose governmental entities are as follows:
(a) Every special purpose governmental entity with the higher of annual receipts
from all sources or annual expenditures of less than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000)[one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)] shall:
1. Annually prepare a financial statement; and
2. Once every four (4) years, contract for the application of an attestation
engagement as determined by the DLG, as provided in subsection (2) of
this section;
(b) Every special purpose governmental entity with the higher of annual receipts
from all sources or annual expenditures equal to or greater than five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000)[one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)] but
less than one million dollars($1,000,000)[five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000)] shall:
1. Annually prepare a financial statement; and
2. Once every four (4) years, contract for the provision of an independent
audit as provided in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) 1. Every special purpose governmental entity with the higher of annual
receipts from all sources or annual expenditures equal to or greater than
one million dollars ($1,000,000)[five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000)] shall, unless qualified for the reporting schedule under
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph:
a.[1.] Annually prepare a financial statement; and
b.[2.] Be audited annually as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
2. a. If a special purpose government entity reporting under this
paragraph conducts two (2) consecutive audits that include no
opinions other than unqualified opinions, the special purpose
governmental entity may choose to comply with the fiscal
reporting schedule in paragraph (b) of this subsection. If the
special purpose governmental entity subsequently conducts an
audit and receives an opinion other than an unqualified opinion
from the audit preparer, the special purpose governmental entity
shall comply with the provisions of subparagraph 1.a. and b. of
this paragraph until the special purpose governmental entity
again conducts two (2) consecutive audits with no opinions other
than unqualified opinions.
b. A special purpose governmental entity subject to this paragraph
shall inform the DLG if it has chosen to comply with the fiscal
reporting schedule as set out in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
The department shall note on the department's website, and in
any reports required under this chapter, the special purpose
governmental entities subject to this paragraph and operating
under the fiscal reporting schedule as set out in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(2) (a) To provide for the performance of an audit or attestation engagement as
provided in subsection (1)(a) to (c) of this section, the governing body of a
special purpose governmental entity shall employ an independent certified
public accountant or contract with the Auditor of Public Accounts to conduct
the audit or attestation engagement unless the provisions of subsection (3) of
this section apply.
(b) The audit or attestation engagement shall be completed no later than twelve
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
(12) months following the close of the fiscal year subject to the audit or the
attestation engagement.
(c) 1. The special purpose governmental entity shall submit for publication on
the registry the audit or attestation engagement, in the form and format
required by the DLG.
2. A federally regulated municipal utility may comply with the
requirements of this section for the public power component of its
operations by submitting an audit that conforms to the requirements
imposed by the federal agency with which it maintains a wholesale
power contract.
3. A public utility established pursuant to KRS 96.740 that is not a
federally regulated municipal utility may comply with the requirements
of this section for the public power component of its operations by
submitting a copy of its annual audit performed under KRS 96.840.
(d) 1. The audit or attestation engagement shall conform to:
a. Generally accepted governmental auditing or attestation standards,
which means those standards for audits or attestations of
governmental organizations, programs, activities, and functions
issued by the Comptroller General of the United States;
b. Generally accepted auditing or attestation standards, which means
those standards for all audits or attestations promulgated by the
American Institute of Certified Public Accountants; and
c. Additional procedures and reporting requirements as may be
required by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
2. Rather than meeting the standards established by subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, the audit submitted by a federally regulated municipal utility
or a public utility established pursuant to KRS 96.740 that is not a
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
federally regulated municipal utility with regard to the public power
component of the utility's operations shall conform to KRS 96.840 and
the financial standards of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission's
Uniform System of Accounts.
(e) Upon request, the Auditor of Public Accounts may review the final report and
all related work papers and documents of the independent certified public
accountant relating to the audit or attestation engagement.
(f) If a special purpose governmental entity is required by another provision of
law to audit its funds more frequently or more stringently than is required by
this section, the special purpose governmental entity shall comply with the
provisions of that law[,] and shall comply with the requirements of paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the
contrary, a unit of government furnishing funds directly to a special purpose
governmental entity may require additional audits at the expense of the unit of
government furnishing the funds.
(h) All audit reports, attestation engagement reports, and financial statements of
special purpose governmental entities shall be public records.
(3) (a) Any board, commission, or agency established by statute with regulatory
authority or oversight responsibilities for a category of special purpose
governmental entities may apply to the Auditor of Public Accounts to be
approved to provide an alternative financial review of the special purpose
governmental entities it regulates or oversees that are required by subsection
(1)(a) of this section to submit an attestation engagement. The application
shall be in the form and format determined by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall review the application and if the auditor
determines that the board, commission, or agency has the resources and
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
capacity to conduct an acceptable alternative financial review, the auditor
shall notify the DLG that the board, commission, or agency is approved to
provide an alternative financial review of the special purpose governmental
entities it regulates or oversees that are required by subsection (1)(a) of this
section to submit an attestation engagement.
(c) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall advise the DLG and the board,
commission, or agency regarding modifications to the proposed alternative
financial review procedures necessary to obtain the Auditor of Public
Accounts' approval.
(d) Any board, commission, or agency approved to provide alternative financial
reviews shall reapply to the Auditor of Public Accounts for approval to
continue to provide alternative financial reviews at least every four (4) years.
The Auditor of Public Accounts may require more frequent approvals.
(e) The Auditor of Public Accounts or the DLG may withdraw any approval
granted under this subsection if the board, commission, or agency fails to
conduct alternative financial reviews using the procedures and including the
terms and components agreed to with the DLG.
(f) Any board, commission, or agency approved to provide alternative financial
reviews shall notify the Auditor of Public Accounts and the DLG if an
irregularity is found in the alternative financial review.
(g) Any special purpose governmental entity subject to regulation or oversight by
a board, commission, or agency that obtains approval to provide an alternative
financial review under this subsection shall have the option of having an
alternative financial review performed by the board, commission, or agency,
or may contract for the application of an attestation engagement as provided
in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(4) The DLG shall determine which procedures conducted under attestation standards
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
will apply to special purpose governmental entities meeting the conditions
established by subsection (1)(a) of this section. The DLG may determine that
additional procedures be conducted under attestation standards for specific
categories of special purpose governmental entities or for specific special purpose
governmental entities, as needed, to obtain the oversight and information deemed
necessary by the DLG.
(5) Based on the information submitted by special purpose governmental entities under
KRS 65A.020 and 65A.090, the DLG shall determine when each special purpose
governmental entity was last audited[,] and shall notify the special purpose
governmental entity of when each audit or attestation engagement is due under the
new standards and requirements of this section.
(6) (a) In determining the requirements relating to audits and financial statements of
special purpose governmental entities under subsection (1) of this section, the
DLG may exclude annual receipts received by the special purpose
governmental entity if:
1. The receipts constitute nonrecurring, nonoperating grants for the
purpose of capital asset acquisition, capital construction, disaster
recovery efforts, or other one (1) time purposes as determined by the
DLG; and
2. The special purpose governmental entity requests, in writing to the DLG
and for each fiscal year it receives the revenue in question, that the
revenues in question not be included in determining its annual revenues.
(b) In determining the requirements relating to audits and financial statements
under subsection (1) of this section of special purpose governmental entities
that are public use airports operating under KRS 183.132 to 183.160, the DLG
may exclude annual receipts received by those public use airports if the
receipts constitute nonoperating or recurring grants for the purpose of capital
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
asset acquisition, capital construction, disaster recovery efforts, or other one
(1) time purposes as determined by the DLG.
(c) Any receipts excluded under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection shall still
be reported as required under KRS 65A.020(2)(a)2.
(7) The DLG may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A
to implement the provisions of this section.
Section 2. KRS 147.635 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An area planning commission created under the provisions of KRS 147.610 to
147.705 shall, not later than two (2) months prior to the first day of its fiscal year,
submit a proposed budget detailing anticipated revenues and expenditures, and a
proposed tax rate, to the area council for its approval on or before the first day of
each such fiscal year.
(2) The area council shall contract with an independent, reputable certified public
accountant to perform an audit of the records, books, and accounts of the area
planning commission in compliance with Section 1 of this Act[for each fiscal
year].
(3) The area planning commission and area council shall comply with the provisions of
KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.
Section 3. KRS 220.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The powers of the board of directors shall be limited to the construction,
maintenance, and operation of such works as are necessary to carry out the purposes
of the district in improvement of sanitation, as set forth in KRS 220.030. The board
shall not permit house and users' connections at the cost of the district, and every
connection shall be made under the supervision of the district. No house or users'
connection shall be made unless and until the house or user is provided with an
adequate water supply.
(2) In order to effect the proper collection and disposal of sewage and other liquid
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
wastes produced within the district, to promote the public health, comfort,
convenience and welfare, and to accomplish all other purposes of the district, the
board may clean out, straighten, alter, deepen, or otherwise improve any stream,
watercourse, or body of water receiving sewage or other liquid wastes and located
in or out of the district; fill up any abandoned or altered stream, watercourse, or
body of water located in or out of the district; construct and maintain laterals, trunk
sewers, intercepting sewers, siphons, pumping stations, treatment and disposal
works, and improvements deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of the
district and construct, preserve, operate, or maintain such works in or out of the
district; construct connections to the works of the district for the delivery thereto of
sewage and other liquid wastes; incorporate with the works of the district or
otherwise utilize any public sewers, drains, or other sewerage improvements either
without modifications or with repairs, modifications, or changes deemed necessary;
construct any and all of the works and improvements across or through any public
or private property in or out of the district; hold, encumber, control, acquire by
donation, purchase, or condemnation, and construct, own, lease, use and sell, any
real or personal property, or any easement necessary for rights-of-way or locations
for the works and improvements of the district, or for any necessary purpose, or for
obtaining or storing material to be used in constructing and maintaining the works
and improvements.
(3) KRS 220.010 to 220.540 shall not limit or interfere with the right of public
corporations to install, maintain, and operate sewerage systems as otherwise
permitted by law, but the board of directors shall have full power and authority in
the construction and maintenance of improvements for the purposes of the district
to serve the area included within the district, and the board of directors may require
the use of the improvements of the district by persons and public corporations
included within the district and for which the improvements were installed.
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
(4) The board of directors shall have an [annual ]audit made by a certified public
accountant in compliance with Section 1 of this Act, copies of which shall be filed
with the Secretary of State and with the county judge/executive of the county or
counties in which the sanitation district is located.
Section 4. KRS 43.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) To determine whether any unauthorized, illegal, irregular, or unsafe handling
or expenditure of revenue or other improper practice of financial
administration has occurred and to assure that all proper items have been duly
charged, taxed, and reported, the Auditor shall audit annually:
1. The funds contained in each county's budget;[ and]
2. The books, accounts, and papers of all county clerks and sheriffs, which
includes receipts paid to county clerks from the collection of:
a. Motor vehicle and motorboat registration fees, motor vehicle and
motorboat licenses, and other receipts due the clerk pertaining to
motor vehicles and motorboats as provided in KRS Chapters 186,
186A, and 235;
b. The motor vehicle usage tax as provided in KRS 138.460; and
c. The ad valorem tax on motor vehicles and motorboats as
provided in KRS 134.800;
County clerks shall transmit a copy of the portion of the audit relating to the
receipts set out in subparagraph 2.a. to c. of this paragraph to the
Department of Revenue and the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet.
(b) The Auditor shall not conduct an audit pursuant to this subsection if the fiscal
court or the elected official notifies the Auditor that a certified public
accountant has been employed to audit the books, accounts, and papers of the
county or the fee office, in accordance with KRS 64.810.
(c) 1. If any county clerk or sheriff meets the criteria established in this
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
subsection and any additional criteria established in administrative
regulations promulgated by the Auditor, that county clerk's or sheriff's
audit required by this section may, in the discretion of the Auditor, be
conducted by an agreed-upon procedures engagement performed by the
Auditor. If, in the discretion of the Auditor, an agreed-upon procedures
engagement in progress will not provide sufficient oversight of the
county clerk's or sheriff's office, the Auditor may at any time convert the
engagement to an audit performed under paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection. A county clerk or sheriff shall not be eligible for the agreed-
upon procedures engagement as allowed in this paragraph for the first
audit period after election if the county clerk or sheriff is serving in
office for the first time, or is assuming the office after experiencing a
break in sequential service in that position.
2. The Auditor and the county clerk or sheriff shall establish specific
procedures for any agreed-upon procedures engagement. If the Auditor
and the county clerk or sheriff cannot agree to the specific procedures
for an agreed-upon procedures engagement, the audit of the county
clerk's or sheriff's office shall be conducted under paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection for that year subject to the audit.
3. At a minimum, the county clerk or sheriff shall meet the following
criteria in order to be eligible to have the county clerk's or sheriff's
annual audit in any particular year conducted using agreed-upon
procedures:
a. The county clerk or sheriff applies to the Auditor to have an
agreed-upon procedures engagement for the year subject to the
audit on a form provided by the Auditor and by the application
deadline established by the Auditor;
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
b. The county clerk's or sheriff's office did not have any reported
audit comment or finding in its most recent audit report;
c. The county clerk or sheriff and the Auditor agree to specific
procedures for the agreed-upon procedures engagement; and
d. Any additional criteria that may be determined by the Auditor.
4. The publication requirements related to an agreed-upon procedures
engagement shall be the same as those required for audits of the county
clerks and sheriffs performed under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection,
except that the Auditor may provide a summary of the agreed-upon
procedures engagement report, and publication of the summary shall
satisfy the statutory requirements to publish the audit report, opinion
letter, and transmittal letter.
5. The billing and expense provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall
apply to any agreed-upon procedures engagement performed under this
section.
6. The Auditor may promulgate administrative regulations that set forth
additional criteria to qualify for agreed-upon procedures engagements,
the application procedures, and the standards, procedures, guidelines,
and reporting requirements for agreed-upon procedures engagements
under this section.
7. In exercising discretion regarding whether a county clerk or sheriff who
otherwise meets the minimum requirements may have an agreed-upon
procedures engagement in lieu of an audit for any particular year subject
to an engagement, and in exercising discretion regarding the proposed
procedures for the agreed-upon procedures engagement for any
particular year subject to an audit, the Auditor may consider factors
including but not limited to past audit comments or agreed-upon
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
procedures engagement findings, assessment of risks, complaints,
financial statements, the number of consecutive agreed-upon procedures
engagements performed of the county clerk or sheriff, and other factors
relevant to oversight of the county clerk's or sheriff's office.
(2) The Auditor may audit:
(a) The books, accounts and papers of all county judges/executive, county
attorneys, coroners and constables; and
(b) The books, accounts, papers, and performance of all special purpose
governmental entities as defined in KRS 65A.010. The expense of any audit
or examination performed pursuant to this paragraph shall be borne by the
entity audited or examined.
(3) (a) The county shall bear one-half (1/2) of the actual expense of the audit
conducted pursuant to subsection (1)(a)1. of this section and shall bear the
total actual expense of the audit conducted pursuant to subsections (1)(a)2.
and (2)(a) of this section. No county shall be required to bear the expense for
more than one (1) audit of the same fund or office annually pursuant to
subsection (1)(a)1. or 2. of this section, except as provided in KRS 64.810(4).
(b) The Kentucky Transportation Cabinet shall bear the cost of the portion of
the audit of receipts from motor vehicles and motorboats required in
subsection (1)(a)2. of this section, regardless of whether the Auditor
prepared the audit required under this section or the county made other
arrangements for the audit under subsection (1)(b) of this section and KRS
64.810.
(4) Within a reasonable time after the completion and distribution of the audit reports
authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall
bill the county for the expenses incurred pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
A copy of this bill shall be forwarded to the secretary of the Finance and
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
Administration Cabinet. Should the fiscal court within sixty (60) days following
receipt of said bill determine the charge to be excessive or otherwise improper it
shall submit its objection to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
and to the State Treasurer for resolution of the controversy in accordance with
subsection (5) of this section. If the amount billed has not been paid within sixty
(60) days from date of billing, and no objection has been filed, the Auditor shall
notify the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the secretary of
revenue who shall cause said amount to be deducted from the next payment or
return of moneys provided by KRS 47.110 by the state to the county or counties.
Deductions shall continue until the total amount due the Auditor's office has been
paid. All moneys received pursuant to this section shall be credited to the trust and
agency account of the Auditor of Public Accounts. When an objection to the bill
has been filed with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the
State Treasurer in accordance with subsection (5) of this section the amount found
to be equitable and just shall become payable immediately upon the entry of the
final decision.
(5) Any controversy over the amount of the bill for the actual expenses incurred shall
be submitted by the fiscal court to the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet and the State Treasurer for a decision as to the proper amount. In the event
that these two (2) arbitrators fail to agree, then the controversy shall be submitted to
the Attorney General, whose decision shall be final.
Section 5. KRS 186.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the cabinet to carry out the provisions of KRS 186.005 to
186.260, and:
(a) Provide to the clerk in each county access to all forms provided for in KRS
186.005 to 186.260;
(b) Keep a numerical record of all registration numbers issued in the state and
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
also keep a record of motor or vehicle identification numbers required by
KRS 186.160;
(c) Furnish to each clerk, originally each year upon estimate, and thereafter upon
requisition at all times, a sufficient supply of standard, noncommercial plates
and the supplies necessary to provide evidence of registration for all classes of
vehicles required to be registered; and
(d) Prescribe a standard plate of practical form and size for police identification
purposes that shall contain:
1. The registration identifier;
2. An indication that Kentucky is the issuing jurisdiction;
3. At the discretion of the cabinet, any combination of the following
phrases:
a. "Bluegrass State"; or
b. "United We Stand, Divided We Fall";
4. For standard plates for noncommercial vehicles:
a. The county in which the plate is issued; and
b. At the discretion of the person to whom the vehicle is registered,
the phrase "In God We Trust"; and
5. For plates for commercial vehicles, the year the license expires and
words or information the Department of Vehicle Regulation may
prescribe by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 186A.127, license plates issued pursuant to this chapter
shall conform to the provisions of subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section. The
Transportation Cabinet shall provide for the issuance of reflectorized plates for all
motor vehicles, and shall collect a fee, in addition to the fee set out in KRS Chapter
186 and KRS 281.631, of fifty cents ($0.50). The fifty cents ($0.50) fee to
reflectorize license plates shall be used by the cabinet as provided in subsection (3)
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
of this section.
(3) The reflectorized license plate program fund is established in the state road fund
and appropriated on a continual basis to the cabinet to administer the moneys as
provided in this subsection. The fifty cents ($0.50) fee collected by the cabinet to
reflectorize license plates shall be deposited into the program fund and used to issue
reflectorized license plates. If at the end of a fiscal year, money remains in the
program fund, it shall be retained in the fund and shall not revert to the state road
fund. The interest and income earned on money in the program fund shall also be
retained in the program fund to carry out the provisions of this subsection. The
Transportation Cabinet shall issue reflectorized license plates under the provisions
of this subsection on a schedule to be determined at the discretion of the cabinet.
(4) Except as directed under subsection (3) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet
shall receive all moneys forwarded by the clerk in each county and turn it over to
the State Treasurer for the benefit of the state road fund.
(5) The Transportation Cabinet shall require an accounting by the clerk in each county
for any moneys received by him or her under the provisions of this chapter, after the
deduction of his or her fees under this chapter, and for all receipts, forms, plates,
and insignia consigned to him or her. The Auditor of Public Accounts, pursuant to
Section 4 of this Act[KRS 43.071], or a certified public accountant acting on
behalf of the county pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of Section 4 of this Act, shall
annually audit each county clerk concerning his or her responsibilities for the
collection of various fees and taxes associated with motor vehicles. The secretary of
the Transportation Cabinet, with the advice, consultation, and approval of the
Auditor, shall develop and implement an inventory and accounting system which
shall insure that the audits mandated in Section 4 of this Act[KRS 43.071] are
performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The
Transportation Cabinet shall pay for the portion of the audit mandated by
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
subsection (1)(a)2. of Section 4 of this Act[ audits mandated by KRS 43.071].
(6) When applied for under KRS 186.060 or 186.061, motor or vehicle numbers
assigned shall be distinctive to show that they were designated by the cabinet.
Section 6. KRS 64.830 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An outgoing county official, as soon as his or her successor has been qualified and
inducted into office and his or her official bond approved, shall immediately vacate
his or her office, deliver to his or her successor all books, papers, records, and
other property held by virtue of his or her office, and make a complete settlement
of his or her accounts as county official, except as otherwise provided in this
section.
(2) (a) Each outgoing county official shall make a final settlement with the fiscal
court of his or her county within sixty (60) days[ by March 15] immediately
following the expiration of his or her term of office, or the date a vacancy is
otherwise created, for all money received by him or her as county official and
to obtain his or her quietus, and immediately thereafter he or she shall deliver
these records to the incumbent county official.
(b) If an official's vacancy does not coincide with the end of the calendar year
or end of the official's term, the outgoing county official shall remit any
remaining funds to the fiscal court as excess fees as determined by the final
settlement pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section. The fiscal court
shall, as soon as practicable, provide an amount equal to the excess fees
remitted by the outgoing official to the outgoing county official's successor
for official use.
(3) The outgoing county official and his or her bondsmen or sureties shall be relieved
in securing his or her quietus and in the final settlement of his or her accounts of
all responsibility for collecting and accounting for the amounts covered by the
receipt and the incoming county official shall be charged with full responsibility for
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1868
collecting and accounting for these amounts as otherwise provided by law for the
collection and accounting of taxes.
(4) The outgoing county official shall be allowed and paid by the fiscal court the
reasonable expenses actually incurred in preparing the receipt required under this
section. Reasonable expenses actually incurred may include his or her office
expenses and salary, and salaries of deputies and employees paid in accordance
with the schedule of the previous year or the amount paid an auditor necessary in
determining and verifying the final settlement to the fiscal court.
Section 7. The following KRS section is repealed:
43.071 Annual audit of county clerk's motor vehicle and motorboat tax receipts.
Section 8. Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act take effect July 1, 2027.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/21/2026 11:36 AM Jacketed